Tennessee, session 114, SB2721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 257 of the Private Acts of 1923, as amended and rewritten by
Chapter 25 of the Private Acts of 2003, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by
deleting Section 5 and substituting:
SECTION 5. Eligibility of Voters. All persons who are qualified to vote in state
and county elections and who reside within the corporate limits of the Town of White
Bluff, or reside outside the boundaries of the Town of White Bluff but within the
boundaries of Dickson County and own real property located within the boundaries of
the Town of White Bluff, shall be entitled to vote in all municipal elections in the Town of
White Bluff, Tennessee; provided, they shall be required to show any registration
receipts and they shall be required to register under any applicable state election
registration laws. For those non-resident real property owners, the non-resident owner
must own at least one-half (1/2) interest in such real property, and such real property
must be at least five thousand square feet (5,000 sq. ft.).
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the Town of White Bluff. Its approval or nonapproval shall be
proclaimed by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2721
011873
- 1 -